Massachusetts, session 194th, H1243.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 4G the
following section:-
Section 4H. An insurer licensed to write and engaged in the writing of homeowners
insurance in the commonwealth shall extend a residential owner’s coverage by 60 days if the
residential owner: (i) received a coverage policy cancellation from the insurer that cited as the
reason for cancellation a condition or conditions of the property; and (ii) is approved for a
federal, state or local housing rehabilitation grant. The commissioner shall verify that the
rehabilitation grant was granted for the purpose of making the necessary repairs to the property
to remediate the cited condition or conditions.
of 1